Utah, session 2026, SB205.
Section 1. Section 53-25-901 is amended to read:53-25-901. Definitions.As used in this part:(1)"Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations, or decisions influencing real or virtual environments.(2)"Generative artificial intelligence" means artificial intelligence technology that is capable of creating content such as text, audio, image, or video based on patterns learned from large volumes of data rather than being explicitly programmed with rules.(3)(a)"Oversight or safeguard setting" means a setting included in a generative artificial intelligence technology that addresses generative artificial intelligence transparency, content safeguards, or human content oversight or verification.(b)"Oversight or safeguard setting" includes:(i)a setting that requires a minimum level of human editing before a report or other document can be marked as complete;(ii)a setting that includes an acknowledgment on a report or other document that the report or other document was drafted by artificial intelligence;(iii)a setting that inserts obvious errors into a draft report or other document; and(iv)a setting that limits the types of crimes for which the generative artificial intelligence technology may be used.(4)"Technology" means a computer system, device, application, software, hardware, algorithm, program, camera system, or similar product.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53-25-902 is amended to read:53-25-902. Use of generative artificial intelligence by law enforcement -- Policy -- Requirements -- Public posting.(1)(a)A law enforcement agency shall have a policy concerning the use of generative artificial intelligence by employees of the law enforcement agency in the course and scope of the law enforcement agency's work.(b)(2)The policy described in Subsection (1)(a)(1) shall:(i)(a)be reviewed and, if necessary, updated, on an annual basis;(b)include the requirements described in Subsection (2)(3); and(ii)(c)provide employees of the law enforcement agency with information concerning the use of generative artificial intelligence, including:(A)(i)which generative artificial intelligence technologies the employees of the law enforcement agency may use;(ii)except as provided in Subsection (5), for each generative artificial intelligence technology described in Subsection (2)(c)(i), the generative artificial intelligence technology's available oversight or safeguard settings;(iii)for each oversight or safeguard setting under Subsection (2)(c)(ii), whether the law enforcement agency:(A)requires the use of the setting;(B)does not use the setting; or(C)allows an employee to disable, bypass, or turn off the setting;(B)(iv)the uses and tasks for which generative artificial intelligence is permitted;(C)(v)the importance of reviewing content generated by generative artificial intelligence; and(D)(vi)an acknowledgment that a violation of the policy described in Subsection (1)(a)(1) may result in administrative disciplinary action by the head of the law enforcement agency.(2)(3)A written police report or other law enforcement record that was created wholly or partially by using generative artificial intelligence shall:(a)contain within the report or record a disclaimer that the report or record contains content generated by artificial intelligence; and(b)include a certification by the author of the report or record that the author has read and reviewed the report or record for accuracy.(4)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (4)(d), a law enforcement agency shall publicly post on the law enforcement agency's website the law enforcement agency's policy described in Subsection (1), including the information described in Subsection (2).(b)If a law enforcement agency does not have a public website, the law enforcement agency shall post the information described in Subsection (4)(a) on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63A-16-601.(c)A law enforcement agency shall update a public posting required under this Subsection (4) no later than 30 days after the day on which any posted information has changed or is otherwise no longer current.(d)This subsection (4) does not apply to prison or jail security, safety, or management, including internal prison or jail monitoring.(5)For purposes of Subsection (2)(c)(ii), a generative artificial intelligence technology does not include technology that uses generative artificial intelligence for an administrative task that does not materially impact a law enforcement investigation, such as a productivity or document management tool or a technology used to check spelling or grammar.(6)A law enforcement agency's failure to comply with the requirements of this section does not preclude the use of:(a)a technology described in this section; or(b)information or evidence created with the use of a technology described in this section.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.